Vermont, session 2025-2026, H42.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. chapter 116 is added to read:
CHAPTER 116. HOUSING BOARD OF APPEALS
§ 4201. BOARD ESTABLISHED
(a) Board established. There is established the Housing Board of Appeals
to hear appeals of municipal zoning decisions on housing projects. The Board
shall be composed of three members who shall be experienced in land use law
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 2 of 12
or housing development, or both. At least one member shall be an attorney
licensed to practice law in the State of Vermont, and at least one member shall
be either a professional engineer or land surveyor. The members of the Board
shall be full-time employees and shall not engage in any other employment,
appointments, or duties during their terms that are in conflict with their duties
as members of the Board.
(b) Terms; chair. The members of the Board shall be appointed by the
Supreme Court for a term of five years and until their successors are appointed
and qualified; provided, however, that any vacancy on the Board shall be filled
for the unexpired term. The initial members of the Board shall serve staggered
terms of three, four, and five years. The Supreme Court shall designate one
member as chair to serve in that capacity for the duration of the member’s
term.
(c) Removal. Any member may be removed by the same authority for
inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office. Before removal, the
member shall be furnished with a copy of the charges and have an opportunity
to be heard in defense.
(d) Salary. Each member of the Board shall receive the same annual salary
as a Superior Court Judge and compensation for reasonable expenses,
including transportation.
(e) Duties.
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 3 of 12
(1) The Board shall have the power and authority to hear and affirm,
reverse, or modify, in whole or in part, appeals of final decisions of appropriate
municipal panels regarding questions of housing and housing development.
This shall include decisions on municipal zoning permits, subdivisions,
variances, and other municipal permits and fees applicable to housing and
housing developments.
(2) Matters subject to the Board’s authority may include mixed-use
combinations of residential and nonresidential uses, which may occur on
separate properties, provided such properties are all part of a common scheme
of development.
(3) In exercising its authority under this chapter, the Board shall have
the power to award all remedies available to the Superior Court in similar
cases, including permission to develop the proposed housing.
(4) After local remedies have been exhausted, an appeal may be brought
before the Board by the applicant or by any other person aggrieved as defined
in 10 V.S.A. § 8502. The municipality shall be a party to the action. If the
applicant is not the party initiating the action before the Board, then the
applicant shall automatically be an intervenor.
(5) The Board shall have authority to administer oaths and to compel the
attendance of witnesses to proceedings before it. The Board shall have the
power to subpoena and subpoena duces tecum. A subpoena or subpoena duces
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 4 of 12
tecum of the Board may be served by any person designated in the subpoena or
subpoena duces tecum to serve it. Any testimony given by a person duly
sworn shall be subject to the pains and penalties of perjury. All applications or
petitions to the Board for which no filing fee has been otherwise specified by
statute shall be accompanied by a $250.00 filing fee.
(f) Quorum; disqualification; temporary members. In all matters, a
majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum to transact business. No
member of the Board shall represent a party or testify as an expert witness or
render any professional service for any party or interest before the Board, and
any member having an interest in the subject matter shall be disqualified to act.
In the event of a disqualification or temporary disability of a member or
members of the Board, the Board shall appoint any temporary Board members
as shall be necessary. Temporary Board members shall serve with respect to a
matter until the same has been fully disposed of before the Board. Temporary
Board members shall have the same qualifications as regular Board members
in whose place they are acting. A temporary Board member shall be
compensated at the rate of $75.00 for each day devoted to the work of the
Board and shall be reimbursed the necessary and reasonable expenses incurred
in the performance of the temporary Board member’s duties. In the event of a
vacancy on the Board, the appellant may elect to continue the proceedings
while awaiting the appointment of a successor Board member.
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 5 of 12
(g) Staff and office. The Board shall have such clerical, administrative, and
technical staff as may be necessary. The Board shall have an office in which
its records, documents, and books shall be kept and with a suitable room in
which it may hold hearings.
§ 4202. HOUSING APPEALS
(a) In matters within its authority, the Board shall have concurrent,
appellate jurisdiction with the Superior Court. Any party seeking to appeal a
municipal zoning decision on a housing project shall bring the appeal to the
Board. The decision to bring an appeal before the Board shall be deemed a
waiver of any right to bring an action in the Superior Court but shall not
abrogate any party’s right to appeal decisions of the Board to the Supreme
Court; as such, the Board shall retain jurisdiction of any matter originally
brought before it. At any time during an appeal to the Board, if the Board
determines that it does not have jurisdiction to hear the appeal, the appellant
shall have 30 days to file an appeal with the Superior Court.
(b) In an appeal of a local decision on housing or housing development,
any claim that is within the Board’s authority and that has previously been or is
subsequently included in an appeal in Superior Court by another party to the
decision or by any other aggrieved or injured party who can demonstrate legal
standing to appeal shall automatically be stayed by the court to provide the
party with standing the opportunity to intervene in the matter before the Board.
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 6 of 12
If intervenor status is granted, the stay of the court action regarding those
claims shall continue during the pendency of the appeal to the Board. After the
Board has decided the appeal, the court shall dismiss the matter before it to the
extent the matter has been resolved by the Board. Any claim included in an
appeal to Superior Court that is not within the Board’s authority shall not be
subject to automatic stay by the court.
(c) Appeals shall be filed with the Board within 30 days following the final
decision of the appropriate municipal panel. At the same time an appeal is
filed with the Board, the applicant shall notify the appropriate municipal panel
of the appeal.
(d) The appropriate municipal panel shall within 30 days following receipt
of notice of appeal submit to the Board a certified record of its proceedings on
the matter subject to the appeal.
(e) The Board shall serve notice in writing of the time, place, and cause of
any hearing upon all parties at least 20 days prior to the date of the hearing.
(f) The Board shall hold a hearing on the merits within 90 days following
its receipt of a notice of appeal.
(g) The Board shall make a decision on an appeal within 60 days after
conducting a hearing on the merits.
(h) Appeals to the Board shall be consistent with appeals to the Superior
Court. Appeals shall be on the certified record, and except in such cases as
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 7 of 12
justice may warrant, in the sole discretion of the Board, no additional evidence
will be introduced. The rules of evidence shall not strictly apply. The Board
shall record the proceedings of any hearing before it and shall make such
recording available to the public for inspection and recording from the date of
the hearing to a date that is 15 working days after the Board has made a final
decision on the matter that is the subject of the hearing or, if an appeal is made
from such decision, the date upon which the matter has been finally
adjudicated, whichever date is later.
(i) The Board shall not reverse or modify a decision except for errors of
law or if the Board is persuaded by the balance of probabilities, on the
evidence before it, that said decision is unreasonable.
(j) Nonattorneys, including professional engineers, architects, and land
surveyors, may represent any party before the Board. Nothing in this section
shall prevent the Board from denying representation by any individual it deems
to be improper, inappropriate, or unable to adequately represent the interests of
the applicant.
(k) The Board’s deliberative processes in adjudicatory proceedings shall be
exempt from the public meeting and notice provisions of 1 V.S.A. chapter 5.
Decisions and orders in adjudicatory proceedings shall be publicly available,
but only after they have been reduced to writing, signed by a quorum of the
Board, and served upon the parties, and shall set forth the Board’s rulings of
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 8 of 12
law and findings of fact in support of its decisions. Discussions and actions by
the Board concerning procedural, administrative, legal, and internal matters
shall be exempt from the meeting and notice provisions of 1 V.S.A. chapter 5.
§ 4203. RULES
The Board shall adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 necessary for
carrying out its functions, including rules of procedure to be followed in
hearings conducted by it consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
§ 4204. APPEALS TO SUPREME COURT
Decisions of the Board may be appealed to the Supreme Court by any party
in accordance with 10 V.S.A. § 8505.
§ 4205. ENFORCEMENT
(a) After a decision of the Board becomes final, the Board shall, at the
request of any party, file a certified abstract in the Superior Court. The clerk of
the court shall enter judgment and such judgment may be enforced as with any
final judgment of the Superior Court.
(b) Neglect or failure on the part of any municipality to comply with such
orders shall be deemed willful neglect of duty, and it shall be subject to the
penalties and damages provided by law in such cases.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 8503 is amended to read:
§ 8503. APPLICABILITY
* * *
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 9 of 12
(c) This chapter shall govern all appeals arising under 24 V.S.A. chapter
117, the planning and zoning chapter, except those appeals brought to the
Housing Board of Appeals pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 116.
* * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:
(1) there shall be no appeal from a District Commission decision when
the Commission has issued a permit and no hearing was requested or held, or
no motion to alter was filed following the issuance of an administrative
amendment;
(2) a municipal decision regarding whether a particular application
qualifies for a recorded hearing under 24 V.S.A. § 4471(b) shall not be subject
to appeal;
(3) if a District Commission issues a partial decision under subsection
6086(b) of this title, any appeal of that decision must be taken within 30 days
following the date of that decision; and
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 10 of 12
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division to issue a decision
on a case regarding an appeal of an appropriate municipal panel decision under
24 V.S.A. chapter 117 within 90 days following the close of the hearing; and
(5) there shall be no appeal from an appropriate municipal panel when
the appellant brings the appeal to the Housing Board of Appeals established
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 116.
* * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 8505 is amended to read:
§ 8505. APPEALS TO THE SUPREME COURT
(a) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Environmental Division
pursuant to this subchapter, any party by right, or the Board, or any person
aggrieved by a decision of the Housing Board of Appeals may appeal to the
Supreme Court within 30 days of following the date of the entry of the order or
judgment appealed from, provided that:
(1) the person was a party to the proceeding before the Environmental
Division or the Housing Board of Appeals; or
(2) the decision being appealed is the denial of party status; or
(3) the Supreme Court determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
participating in the proceeding; or
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 11 of 12
(B) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal were disallowed.
(b) An objection that has not been raised before the Environmental
Division or the Housing Board of Appeals may not be considered by the
Supreme Court, unless the failure or neglect to raise that objection is excused
by the Supreme Court because of extraordinary circumstances.
* * *
Sec. 5. HOUSING BOARD OF APPEALS POSITIONS;
APPROPRIATION
(a) The following new positions are created at the Housing Board of
Appeals for the purposes of carrying out this act:
(1) three full-time Housing Board of Appeals members; and
(2) one Staff Attorney 1.
(b) The sum of $600,000.00 is appropriated to the Housing Board of
Appeals from the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 for the positions established
in subsection (a) of this section and for additional operating costs required to
implement the appeals process established in this act.
Sec. 6. HOUSING BOARD OF APPEALS CREATION
The Supreme Court shall appoint the members of the Housing Board of
Appeals on or before July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379302 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.42
2025 Page 12 of 12
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379302 v.1